Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-914
Treatment facility, defined.

Treatment facility means a facility which is licensed to provide services for persons who are mentally ill or substance dependent or both.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 252, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 275, § 24;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 83-1006;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 34.